incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="j/o__p">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:0"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isakA</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inakA</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inake</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inakI</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isa</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isane</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ise</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isako</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isase</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isameM</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isapara</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ina</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inhoMne</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inheM</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inako</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inase</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inameM</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inapara</l><r>o<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="jo"><i>j</i><par n="j/o__p"/></e>
